Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-616
Computer program, defined.

Computer program means a set of statements or instructions to be used directly or indirectly in an information processing system in order to bring about a certain result.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 378.